Maryland, session 2026, SB0327.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That Section(s) 5–619 and 5–620 of Article – Criminal Law of the Annotated Code of
Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0327*

SENATE BILL 327
Article – Criminal Law
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
[(h) “Controlled paraphernalia” means:
(1) a hypodermic syringe, needle, or any other object or combination of
objects adapted to administer a controlled dangerous substance by hypodermic injection;
(2) a gelatin capsule, glassine envelope, or other container suitable for
packaging individual quantities of a controlled dangerous substance; or
(3) lactose, quinine, mannite, mannitol, dextrose, sucrose, procaine
hydrochloride, or any other substance suitable as a diluent or adulterant.]
[(i)] (H) “Deliver” means to make an actual, constructive, or attempted transfer
or exchange from one person to another whether or not remuneration is paid or an agency
relationship exists.
[(j)] (I) “Department” means the Maryland Department of Health.
[(k)] (J) “Depressant or stimulant drug” means a drug that contains any
quantity of a substance that the Attorney General of the United States by regulation
designates as having a potential for abuse because of:
(1) a depressant or stimulant effect on the central nervous system; or
(2) a hallucinogenic effect.
[(l)] (K) (1) “Dispense” means to deliver to the ultimate user or the human
research subject by or in accordance with the lawful order of an authorized provider.
(2) “Dispense” includes to prescribe, administer, package, label, or
compound a substance for delivery.
[(m)] (L) “Distribute” means, with respect to a controlled dangerous substance,
to deliver other than by dispensing.
[(n)] (M) (1) “Drug” means:
(i) a substance recognized in the official United States
Pharmacopoeia, official Homeopathic Pharmacopoeia of the United States, or official
National Formulary;

SENATE BILL 327 3
(ii) a substance intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation,
treatment, or prevention of disease in humans or other animals;
(iii) except for food, a substance intended to affect the structure or
function of the body of humans or other animals; or
(iv) a substance intended for use as a component of any substance
specified in item (i), (ii), or (iii) of this paragraph.
(2) “Drug” does not include a device or an accessory, part, or component of
a device.
[(o)] (N) “Drug dependent person” means a person who:
(1) is using a controlled dangerous substance; and
(2) is in a state of psychological or physical dependence, or both, that:
(i) arises from administration of that controlled dangerous
substance on a continuous basis; and
(ii) is characterized by behavioral and other responses that include
a strong compulsion to take the substance on a continuous basis in order to experience its
psychological effects or to avoid the discomfort of its absence.
[(p) (1) “Drug paraphernalia” means equipment, a product, or material that is
used, intended for use, or designed for use, in:
(i) planting, propagating, cultivating, growing, harvesting,
manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing, preparing, packaging,
repackaging, storing, containing, or concealing a controlled dangerous substance in
violation of this title; or
(ii) injecting, ingesting, inhaling, or otherwise introducing into the
human body a controlled dangerous substance in violation of this title.
(2) “Drug paraphernalia” includes:
(i) a kit used, intended for use, or designed for use in planting,
propagating, cultivating, growing, or harvesting any species of plant that is a controlled
dangerous substance other than cannabis or from which a controlled dangerous substance
can be derived;
(ii) a kit used, intended for use, or designed for use in
manufacturing, compounding, converting, producing, processing, or preparing a controlled
dangerous substance other than cannabis;

SENATE BILL 327
(iii) an isomerization device used, intended for use, or designed for
use in increasing the potency of any species of plant that is a controlled dangerous
substance other than cannabis;
(iv) testing equipment used, intended for use, or designed for use in
analyzing the strength, effectiveness, or purity of a controlled dangerous substance other
than cannabis;
(v) a scale or balance used, intended for use, or designed for use in
weighing or measuring a controlled dangerous substance other than cannabis;
(vi) a diluent or adulterant, such as quinine hydrochloride, mannitol,
mannite, dextrose, or lactose, used, intended for use, or designed for use in cutting a
controlled dangerous substance other than cannabis;
(vii) a separation gin or sifter used, intended for use, or designed for
use in removing twigs and seeds from, or in otherwise cleaning or refining, a controlled
dangerous substance other than cannabis;
(viii) a blender, bowl, container, spoon, or mixing device used,
intended for use, or designed for use in compounding a controlled dangerous substance
other than cannabis;
(ix) a capsule, balloon, envelope, or other container used, intended
for use, or designed for use in packaging small quantities of a controlled dangerous
substance other than cannabis;
(x) a container or other object used, intended for use, or designed for
use in storing or concealing a controlled dangerous substance other than cannabis;
(xi) a hypodermic syringe, needle, or other object used, intended for
use, or designed for use in parenterally injecting a controlled dangerous substance into the
human body; and
(xii) an object used, intended for use, or designed for use in ingesting,
inhaling, or otherwise introducing cocaine into the human body.]
[(p–1)] (O) “Electronic prescription” means a prescription that:
(1) is generated on an electronic application and transmitted as an
electronic data file; and
(2) if the prescription is for a controlled dangerous substance, complies
with the requirements of 21 C.F.R. Part 1306.

SENATE BILL 327 5
[(q)] (P) (1) “Manufacture”, with respect to a controlled dangerous substance,
means to produce, prepare, propagate, compound, convert, or process a controlled
dangerous substance:
(i) directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of natural
origin;
(ii) independently by chemical synthesis; or
(iii) by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis.
(2) “Manufacture” includes to package and repackage a controlled
dangerous substance and label and relabel its containers.
(3) “Manufacture” does not include:
(i) to prepare or compound a controlled dangerous substance by an
individual for the individual’s own use; or
(ii) to prepare, compound, package, or label a controlled dangerous
substance:
1. by an authorized provider incidental to administering or
dispensing a controlled dangerous substance in the course of professional practice; or
2. if the controlled dangerous substance is not for sale by an
authorized provider, or by the authorized provider’s agent under the authorized provider’s
supervision, for or incidental to research, teaching, or chemical analysis.
[(r)] (Q) (1) “Narcotic drug” means a substance:
(i) that has been found to present an extreme danger to the health
and welfare of the community because of addiction–forming and addiction–sustaining
qualities;
(ii) that is:
1. an opiate;
2. a compound, manufactured substance, salt, derivative, or
preparation of opium, coca leaf, or an opiate; or
3. a substance and any compound, manufactured substance,
salt, derivative, or preparation that is chemically identical with a substance listed in items
1 and 2 of this item; and
(iii) that is produced:

SENATE BILL 327
1. directly or indirectly by extraction from substances of
vegetable origin;
2. independently by chemical synthesis; or
3. by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis.
(2) “Narcotic drug” includes decocainized coca leaf or an extract of coca leaf
that does not contain cocaine or ecgonine.
[(s)] (R) “Noncontrolled substance” means a substance that is not classified as a
controlled dangerous substance under Subtitle 4 of this title.
[(t)] (S) (1) “Opiate” means a substance that has an addiction–forming or
addiction–sustaining quality similar to morphine or that can be converted into a drug that
has this addiction–forming or addiction–sustaining quality.
(2) “Opiate” includes:
(i) the racemic and levorotatory forms of an opiate;
(ii) except for seeds, the opium poppy, the plant of the species
Papaver somniferum L.;
(iii) the poppy straw consisting of the opium poppy after mowing
except the seeds; and
(iv) coca leaf.
(3) “Opiate” does not include, unless specifically designated as controlled
under § 5–202 of this title, the dextrorotatory isomer of 3–methoxy–n–methyl–morphinan
and its salts (dextromethorphan).
[(u)] (T) “Personal use amount” means:
(1) an amount of usable cannabis that does not exceed 1.5 ounces;
(2) an amount of concentrated cannabis that does not exceed 12 grams;
(3) an amount of cannabis products containing
delta–9–tetrahydrocannabinol that does not exceed 750 milligrams; or
(4) two or fewer cannabis plants.
[(v)] (U) “Possess” means to exercise actual or constructive dominion or control
over a thing by one or more persons.

SENATE BILL 327 7
[(w)] (V) (1) “Prescription drug” means a drug that:
(i) is intended to be used by an individual; and
(ii) because of its toxicity, other potentiality for harmful effect,
method of use, or collateral measures necessary for its use:
1. bears a cautionary label warning a person that under
federal law the drug may not be dispensed without a prescription; or
2. is designated by the Department as not safe for use except
under the supervision of a person licensed by the State to administer a prescription drug.
(2) “Prescription drug” does not include a controlled dangerous substance.
[(x)] (W) “Produce”, with respect to a controlled dangerous substance, includes
to manufacture, plant, cultivate, grow, and harvest.
[(y)] (X) “Registrant” means a person who is registered by the Department to
manufacture, distribute, or dispense a controlled dangerous substance in the State.
[(z)] (Y) “Schedule I” means the controlled dangerous substances described in §
5–402 of this title.
[(aa)] (Z) “Schedule II” means the controlled dangerous substances described in
§ 5–403 of this title.
[(bb)] (AA) “Schedule III” means the controlled dangerous substances described in
§ 5–404 of this title.
[(cc)] (BB) “Schedule IV” means the controlled dangerous substances described in
§ 5–405 of this title.
[(dd)] (CC) “Schedule V” means the controlled dangerous substances described in §
5–406 of this title.
[(ee)] (DD) “Secretary” means the Secretary of the Department.
[(ff)] (EE) “Ultimate user” means a person who lawfully possesses a controlled
dangerous substance for the person’s own use, for the use of a member of the person’s
household, or for administration to an animal owned by the person or by a member of the
person’s household.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.